Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.270

Sales to be by public auction.

All sales of real property made by the referees shall be made by public auction, to the highest bidder, in the manner required for the sale of real property on execution. The notice shall state the terms of sale, and if the property, or any part of it is to be sold, subject to a prior estate, charge or lien, that shall be stated in the notice.

[Code 1881 s 578; 1877 p 121 s 581; 1869 p 138 s 531; RRS s 864.]